Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.200

Statewide sexual assault kit tracking system—Participation by sheriff and deputies.

A sheriff and his or her deputies shall participate in the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system established in RCW 43.43.545 for the purpose of tracking the status of all sexual assault kits in the custody of the department and other entities contracting with the department. A sheriff shall begin full participation in the system according to the implementation schedule established by the Washington state patrol.

[ 2016 c 173 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 173: See note following RCW 43.43.545.